New Mexico, session 2026, HB261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Three million dollars ($3,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the public education department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for grants to small rural school districts for the purchase of buses for student activities. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233370.2